pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Consumíveis de escritório gerais > Fita adesiva: Fita adesiva invisível; Fita adesiva transparente
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Văn phòng phẩm thông dụng > Băng dính văn phòng: Băng dính tàng hình; Băng dính trong suốt
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Fournitures de bureau générales > Ruban adhésif: Ruban adhésif invisible; Ruban adhésif transparent
en: Office Supplies > General Office Supplies > Office Tape: Invisible Tape; Transparent Tape
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Genel Ofis Malzemeleri > Selobant: Görünmez Bant; Şeffaf Bant
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Канцтовары общего назначения > Клейкая лента для офиса: Матовая клейкая лента; Глянцевая клейкая лента
de: Bürobedarf > Schreibwaren > Büroklebeband: Unsichtbares Klebeband; Durchsichtiges Klebeband
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Allmänt kontorsmaterial > Kontorstejp: Osynlig tejp; Genomskinlig tejp
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bendrosios paskirties biuro reikmenys > Biuro juosta: Nematoma juosta; Skaidri juosta
it: Forniture per ufficio > Forniture generiche per ufficio > Nastro adesivo: Nastro adesivo invisibile; Nastro adesivo trasparente
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์สำนักงานทั่วไป > เทปกาว: เทปใส; เทปโปร่งใส
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 一般事務用品 > 事務用膠帶: 隱形膠帶; 透明膠帶
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Algemene kantoorbenodigdheden > Plakband voor op kantoor: Onzichtbare plakband; Doorzichtige plakband
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Artykuły różne > Taśmy samoprzylepne: Taśma niewidoczna; Taśma przezroczysta
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Všeobecné kancelárske potreby > Kancelárska páska: Neviditeľná páska; Priehľadná páska
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用消耗品 > セロハンテープ: 見えないテープ; 透明テープ
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Suprimentos em geral > Fita para escritório: Fita invisível; Fita transparente
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Consumabile generale de birou > Bandă adezivă: Bandă invizibilă; Bandă transparentă
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Splošni pisarniški material > Pisarniški lepilni trak: Prozorni lepilni trak; Prozorni trak
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Общи офис консумативи > Тиксо за офиса: Невидимо тиксо; Прозрачно тиксо
da: Kontorforsyning > Generelle forbrugsvarer > Kontortape: Usynlig tape; Gennemsigtig tape
ko: 사무용품 > 일반 사무용품 > 사무용 테이프: 반투명 테이프; 투명 테이프
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Opći uredski materijal > Selotejp: Nevidljiva ljepljiva traka; Prozirna ljepljiva traka
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 一般办公用品 > 办公胶带: 隐形胶带; 透明胶带
hu: Irodai kellékek > Általános irodai kellékek > Irodai szalag: Láthatatlan szalag; Átlátszó szalag
nb: Kontormateriell > Generelt kontorutstyr > Kontortape: Usynlig tape; Gjennomsiktig tape
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Γενικά είδη γραφείου > Κολλητική ταινία γραφείου: Αόρατη κολλητική ταινία; Διαφανής κολλητική ταινία
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Yleiset toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistoteippi: Näkymätön teippi; Läpinäkyvä teippi
es: Material de oficina > Productos generales > Cinta adhesiva de oficina: Cinta invisible; Cinta transparente
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Obecné kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářská páska: Neviditelná páska; Průhledná páska